Hawaii statutes.
§201H-10 Cooperative agreements with other
governmental agencies. (a) The corporation may:

(1) Obtain the aid and cooperation of governmental
agencies in the planning, construction, and operation of housing projects and
enter into agreements and arrangements as it deems advisable to obtain aid and
cooperation;

(2) Arrange or enter into agreements with any
governmental agency for the acquisition of property, options, or property
rights or for the furnishing, installing, opening, or closing of streets, roads,
alleys, sidewalks, or other places, or for the furnishing of property,
services, parks, sewage, water, and other facilities in connection with housing
projects, or for the changing of the map of a political subdivision or the
planning, replanning, zoning, or rezoning of any part of a political
subdivision;

(3) Procure insurance or guarantees from any
governmental agency for the payment of any debts or parts thereof incurred by
the corporation, including the power to pay premiums on any such insurance; and

(4) Agree to make payments to any state or county
agency, if the agency is authorized to accept payments, as the corporation
deems consistent with the maintenance of the character of housing projects or
the purposes of this chapter.

(b) For the purpose of aiding and cooperating
in the planning, construction, and operation of housing projects located within
their respective territorial boundaries, any state or county agency, upon those
terms, with or without consideration, as it determines, may:

(1) Dedicate, grant, sell, convey, or lease any of
its property or grant easements, licenses, or any other rights or privileges
therein to the corporation or to the federal government;

(2) To the extent that it is within the scope of the
agency:

(A) Cause the services customarily provided
by the agency to be rendered for the benefit of housing projects and the
occupants thereof;

(B) Provide and maintain parks, sewage,
water, lights, and other facilities adjacent to or in connection with housing
projects;

(C) Open, close, pave, install, or change the
grade of streets, roads, roadways, alleys, sidewalks, or other related
facilities; and

(D) Change the map of a political subdivision
or plan, replan, zone, or rezone any part of a political subdivision;

(3) Enter into agreements with the corporation with
respect to the exercise of their powers relating to the repair, closing, or
demolition of unsafe, unsanitary, or unfit dwellings;

(4) Employ, notwithstanding any other law as to what
constitutes legal investments, any available funds belonging to them or within
their control, including funds derived from the sale or furnishing of property
or facilities to the corporation, in the purchase of bonds or other obligations
of the corporation; and exercise all the rights of any holder of the bonds or
other obligations;

(5) Do any and all things necessary or convenient to
aid and cooperate in the planning, undertaking, and construction of those
housing projects; and

(6) Enter into contracts with the corporation or the
federal government for any period agreeing to exercise any of the powers
conferred hereby or to take any other action in aid of those housing projects.

In connection with the exercise of this power,
any political subdivision may incur the entire expense of any public
improvements located within its territorial boundaries without assessment
against abutting property owners.

For the purpose of aiding and cooperating in
the planning, construction, and operation of housing projects, the department
of land and natural resources, the Hawaiian homes commission, and any other
agency of the State having power to manage or dispose of its public lands, with
the approval of the governor and with or without consideration, may grant,
sell, convey, or lease, for any period, any parts of those public lands,
without limit as to area, to the corporation or to the federal government.

Any law to the contrary notwithstanding, any
gift, grant, sale, conveyance, lease, or agreement provided for in this section
may be made by the state or county government without appraisal, public notice,
advertisement, or public bidding.

If at any time title to, or possession of, any
housing project is held by any governmental agency authorized by law to engage
in the development or administration of low-income housing or slum clearance
projects, any agreement made under this chapter relating to the project shall
inure to the benefit of and may be enforced by that governmental agency.

Insofar as this subsection is inconsistent with
the provisions of any other law, this subsection shall be controlling.

(c) Any county in which a housing project is
located or is about to be located may make donations or advances to the
corporation in sums as the county in its discretion may determine. The
advances or donations shall be made for the purpose of aiding or cooperating in
the construction and operation of the housing project. The corporation, when
it has money available therefor, shall reimburse the county for all advances
made by way of a loan to it. [L 2005, c 196, pt of §20; am L 2006, c 180, §15;
am L 2007, c 249, §14; am L 2009, c 143, §3]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next